Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201368-1806.01
Tax; use.

The department shall collect the tax provided
for in section 68-1803 and remit the tax to the State Treasurer for credit
to the ICF/DD Reimbursement Protection Fund. Beginning July 1, 2014, no proceeds
from the tax provided for in section 68-1803, including the federal match,
shall be placed in the General Fund unless otherwise provided in the ICF/DD
Reimbursement Protection Act.

Laws 2013, LB23, § 22.
September 6, 2013